Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202649-707
Supplements and reissued or replacement volumes of the statutes; distribution; price; disposition of proceeds; receipts.

The supplements and reissued or replacement volumes of the statutes of Nebraska shall be sold and distributed by the Clerk of the Legislature at such price as shall be prescribed by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council pursuant to the policy described in section 49-601, which price shall be sufficient to recover all costs of publication and distribution.

All money received by the Clerk of the Legislature from the sale of the supplements and reissued or replacement volumes shall be paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Nebraska Statutes Cash Fund or the Nebraska Statutes Distribution Cash Fund, as appropriate. That portion of the money received that represents the costs of publication shall be credited to the Nebraska Statutes Cash Fund, and that portion of the money received that represents the costs of distribution shall be credited to the Nebraska Statutes Distribution Cash Fund. The Clerk of the Legislature shall take receipts for all such money paid into the funds.

Laws 1945, c. 119, § 7, p. 394;

Laws 1965, c. 306, § 5, p. 862;

Laws 1965, c. 305, § 2, p. 860;

Laws 1977, LB 8, § 3;

Laws 1980, LB 598, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 991, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 572, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB576, § 1;

Laws 2022, LB708, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1236, § 15.
January 1, 2027